Missouri, session 2026, HB1833.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 103, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 103.087, to read as follows:
103.087. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an active employee who
is eligible for coverage in the program of health care benefits established by the board
under this chapter may elect not to receive that coverage and instead be paid an annual
stipend if all of the following occur:
(1) The employee is eligible for a contribution from the state toward the cost of
the coverage;
(2) The employee makes the election on a form provided by the board and
provides proof of coverage under a separate health insurance plan as described under
subdivision (3) of this subsection; and
(3) Either:
(a) The employee makes the election within thirty-one days of his or her hire
date. If an employee makes the election under this paragraph, the proof required under
subdivision (2) of this subsection shall be proof that the employee is currently covered
by a separate health insurance plan. Any employee who makes the election under this
paragraph shall not receive the health care coverage under this chapter during the
calendar year in which the election is made; or
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1833 2
(b) The employee makes the election during any applicable open enrollment
period established by the board. If the employee makes the election under this
paragraph, the proof required under subdivision (2) of this subsection shall be proof
that the employee will be covered by a separate health insurance plan at or before the
beginning of the succeeding calendar year. Any employee who makes the election under
this paragraph shall not receive the health care coverage under this chapter during the
succeeding calendar year.
2. (1) The annual stipend paid to an employee under subsection 1 of this section
shall be equal to fifty percent of the amount that the state would have paid to contribute
toward the cost of the health care coverage for the individual employee during the
relevant calendar year if the employee had enrolled in such coverage. Contributions
that the state would have paid toward the cost of health care coverage for any spouse or
dependents of an employee shall not be considered in determining the amount of the
stipend.
(2) If any relevant period in which the employee is forgoing health care coverage
under subsection 1 of this section is less than a full calendar year, the stipend shall be
prorated accordingly.
3. The annual stipend paid to an employee under subsection 1 of this section
shall be treated as taxable income from state employment.
4. Nothing in this section shall apply to dental or vision benefit coverage.
✔